Colorado, session 2026A, HB1162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of military and
veterans affairs for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session
Laws of Colorado 2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part
XIV as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XIV
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS
(1) EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR AND ARMY NATIONAL GUARD
Personal Services74 3,066,550 2,646,050 4,260a 416,240(I)b
(29.4 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 2,188,185 872,373 43,912a 1,271,900(I)b
2,197,698 855,664 45,348a 1,296,686(I)b
Short-term Disability 10,157 4,118 196a 5,843(I)b
Paid Family Medical Leave
Insurance 65,294 26,475 1,258a 37,561(I)b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 1,450,964 588,336 27,946a 834,682(I)b
Salary Survey 400,578 161,050 7,659a 231,869(I)b
Step Pay 123,286 55,488 2,289a 65,509(I)b
PERA Direct Distribution 285,383 115,717 5,497a 164,169(I)b
279,886
Workers' Compensation 137,377 64,173 73,204(I)b
Operating Expenses74 1,140,031 1,044,031 96,000c
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 232,817 232,817
Legal Services 106,028 106,028
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 1,268,201 1,268,201
Vehicle Lease Payments74 135,712 64,366 71,346(I)b
108,353 51,397 56,956(I)b
Leased Space 63,893 63,893
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1162

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 60,973 60,973
Annual Depreciation-Lease
Equivalent Payment 87,994 87,994
Payments to OIT 764,306 764,306
761,565 761,565
CORE Operations 12,261 12,261
Digital Trunk Radio 53,688 53,688
Civil Air Patrol Operations 70,365 70,365
Local Armory Incentive
Plan 20,000 20,000c
Statewide Indirect Cost
Collections 163,923 4,688d 1,042e 158,193(I)b
Appropriation to the
Colorado National Guard
Tuition Fund 1,208,200 1,208,200
Army National Guard
Cooperative Agreement74 15,603,656 2,240,170 13,363,486(I)b
(84.1 FTE)
28,719,822
28,699,235
a This amount includes approximately $59,404 from the Western Slope Military Veterans' Cemetery Fund created in Section 28-5-708 (1)(a), C.R.S., $204 from the Veterans One-stop
Center Cash Fund created in Section 28-5-713 (4), C.R.S., and $33,409 $34,845 from various sources of cash funds.
b These amounts are pursuant to cooperative agreements with the federal government for operations of the Colorado National Guard and are shown for informational purposes only.
c Of this amount an estimated $66,000 shall be from Armory Lease and Real Estate Proceeds, pursuant to Section 28-3-106 (1)(s)(I), C.R.S., and an estimated $50,000 shall be from
the Electric Vehicle Services Equipment Fund created in section 28-3-110 (1), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from various sources of cash funds.
e This amount shall be from statewide indirect cost collections.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1162

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(2) DIVISION OF VETERANS AFFAIRS
Veterans Service Operations 1,836,476 1,789,496 46,980a
(19.0 FTE)
Veterans Mental Health
Services 5,260,143 260,143 5,000,000f
(2.0 FTE)
County Veterans Service
Officer Payments 1,367,189 1,367,189
Colorado State Veterans
Trust Fund Expenditures75 1,683,256 1,683,256a
Veterans Assistance Grant
Program 1,257,886 1,100,000 157,886b
(0.5 FTE)
Western Slope Veterans
Cemetery 759,945 489,956 269,989c
(7.8 FTE)
Grand Junction Veterans
One-stop Center/Western
Region One Source 386,749 160,442 201,307d 25,000(I)e
(3.1 FTE) (1.0 FTE)
12,551,644
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado State Veterans Trust Fund created in Section 28-5-709 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Veterans Assistance Grant Program Cash Fund created in Section 28-5-712 (3), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be from the Western Slope Military Veterans' Cemetery Fund created in Section 28-5-708 (1)(a), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Veterans One-stop Center Cash Fund created in Section 28-5-713 (4), C.R.S.
e This amount is estimated to be received from amounts appropriated in the Colorado State Veterans Trust Fund Expenditures line item in this division.
f This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Human Services, Behavioral Health Administration, Community-based Mental Health Services, Veterans Mental Health
line item appropriation.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1162

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) AIR NATIONAL GUARD
Operations and Maintenance
Agreement for
Buckley/Greeley 3,126,844 474,112 2,652,732(I)a
(28.0 FTE)
Air Traffic Control Buckley 737,692 737,692(I)a
(7.0 FTE)
Security for Space
Command Facility at
Greeley 390,000 390,000(I)a
(6.0 FTE)
4,254,536
a These amounts are pursuant to cooperative agreements with the federal government for operations of the Colorado National Guard and are shown for informational purposes only.
(4) FEDERAL FUNDED PROGRAMS
National Guard Service
Members 113,800,000 113,800,000(I)a
(2,150.0 FTE)
113,800,000
a This amount is an estimate of federal expenditures for Colorado National Guard military personnel. This amount is not accounted for in the state accounting system and is shown for
informational purposes only.
TOTALS PART XIV
(MILITARY AND
VETERANS AFFAIRS) $159,326,002 $17,452,411 $2,573,123 5,026,042a $134,274,426b
$159,305,415 $17,584,161 $2,574,559 $134,120,653b
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1162

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $25,000 contains an (I) notation.
b This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
74 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, Executive Director and Army National Guard, Personal Services; Operating Expenses; Vehicle Lease Payments;
Army National Guard Cooperative Agreement -- In addition to the transfer authority provided in Section 24-75-108, C.R.S., the Department is authorized
to transfer up to 20.0 percent of the total General Fund appropriations in these line items between these line items. Transfers to or from the Vehicle Lease
Payments line item may be used solely to address changes in the portion of costs covered by federal authorities for vehicle lease payments.
75 Department of Military and Veterans Affairs, Division of Veterans Affairs, Colorado State Veterans Trust Fund Expenditures -- This appropriation remains
available for expenditure until the close of the 2025-26 state fiscal year.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1162

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1162